Illinois, session 104th, SB59.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 4-10, 5-9, and 6-37 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/4-10)  (from Ch. 46, par. 4-10)7    Sec. 4-10. Except as herein provided, no person shall be 8registered, unless he applies in person to a registration 9officer, answers such relevant questions as may be asked of 10him by the registration officer, and executes the affidavit of 11registration. The registration officer shall require the 12applicant to furnish two forms of identification, and except 13in the case of a homeless individual, one of which must include 14his or her residence address. These forms of identification 15shall include, but not be limited to, any of the following: 16driver's license, social security card, public aid 17identification card, utility bill, employee or student 18identification card, lease or contract for a residence, credit 19card, or a civic, union or professional association membership 20card. The registration officer shall require a homeless 21individual to furnish evidence of his or her use of the mailing 22address stated. This use may be demonstrated by a piece of mail 23addressed to that individual and received at that address or   SB0059- 2 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1by a statement from a person authorizing use of the mailing 2address. The registration officer shall require each applicant 3for registration to read or have read to him the affidavit of 4registration before permitting him to execute the affidavit.5    One of the registration officers or a deputy registration 6officer, county clerk, or clerk in the office of the county 7clerk, shall administer to all persons who shall personally 8apply to register the following oath or affirmation:9    "You do solemnly swear (or affirm) that you will fully and 10truly answer all such questions as shall be put to you touching 11your name, place of residence, place of birth, your 12qualifications as an elector and your right as such to 13register and vote under the laws of the State of Illinois."14    The registration officer shall satisfy himself that each 15applicant for registration is qualified to register before 16registering him. If the registration officer has reason to 17believe that the applicant is a resident of a Soldiers' and 18Sailors' Home or any facility which is licensed or certified 19pursuant to the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental 20Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care 21Act, or the MC/DD Act, the following question shall be put, 22"When you entered the home which is your present address, was 23it your bona fide intention to become a resident thereof?" Any 24voter of a township, city, village or incorporated town in 25which such applicant resides, shall be permitted to be present 26at the place of any precinct registration and shall have the   SB0059- 3 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1right to challenge any applicant who applies to be registered.2    In case the officer is not satisfied that the applicant is 3qualified he shall forthwith notify such applicant in writing 4to appear before the county clerk to complete his 5registration. Upon the card of such applicant shall be written 6the word "incomplete" and no such applicant shall be permitted 7to vote unless such registration is satisfactorily completed 8as hereinafter provided. No registration shall be taken and 9marked as incomplete if information to complete it can be 10furnished on the date of the original application.11    Any person claiming to be an elector in any election 12precinct and whose registration card is marked "Incomplete" 13may make and sign an application in writing, under oath, to the 14county clerk in substance in the following form:15    "I do solemnly swear that I, ...., did on (insert date) 16make application to the board of registry of the .... precinct 17of the township of .... (or to the county clerk of .... county) 18and that said board or clerk refused to complete my 19registration as a qualified voter in said precinct. That I 20reside in said precinct, that I intend to reside in said 21precinct, and am a duly qualified voter of said precinct and am 22entitled to be registered to vote in said precinct at the next 23election.24(Signature of applicant) ............................."  25    All such applications shall be presented to the county   SB0059- 4 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1clerk or to his duly authorized representative by the 2applicant, in person between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 5:00 3p.m. on any day after the days on which the 1969 and 1970 4precinct re-registrations are held but not on any day within 527 days preceding the ensuing general election and thereafter 6for the registration provided in Section 4-7 all such 7applications shall be presented to the county clerk or his 8duly authorized representative by the applicant in person 9between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. on any day prior 10to 27 days preceding the ensuing general election. Such 11application shall be heard by the county clerk or his duly 12authorized representative at the time the application is 13presented. If the applicant for registration has registered 14with the county clerk, such application may be presented to 15and heard by the county clerk or by his duly authorized 16representative upon the dates specified above or at any time 17prior thereto designated by the county clerk.18    Any otherwise qualified person who is absent from his 19county of residence either due to business of the United 20States or because he is temporarily outside the territorial 21limits of the United States may become registered by mailing 22an application to the county clerk within the periods of 23registration provided for in this Article, or by simultaneous 24application for registration by mail and vote by mail ballot 25as provided in Article 20 of this Code.26    Upon receipt of such application the county clerk shall   SB0059- 5 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1immediately mail an affidavit of registration in duplicate, 2which affidavit shall contain the following and such other 3information as the State Board of Elections may think it 4proper to require for the identification of the applicant:5    Name. The name of the applicant, giving surname and first 6or Christian name in full, and the middle name or the initial 7for such middle name, if any.8    Sex.9    Residence. The name and number of the street, avenue or 10other location of the dwelling, and such additional clear and 11definite description as may be necessary to determine the 12exact location of the dwelling of the applicant. Where the 13location cannot be determined by street and number, then the 14Section, congressional township and range number may be used, 15or such other information as may be necessary, including post 16office mailing address.17    Electronic mail address, if the registrant has provided 18this information. 19    Term of residence in the State of Illinois and the 20precinct.21    Nativity. The State or country in which the applicant was 22born.23    Citizenship. Whether the applicant is native born or 24naturalized. If naturalized, the court, place and date of 25naturalization.26    Age. Date of birth, by month, day and year.  SB0059- 6 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1    Out of State address of ..........................2AFFIDAVIT OF REGISTRATION3State of ...........) 4                   )ss 5County of ..........)6    I hereby swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen of the 7United States; that on the day of the next election I shall 8have resided in the State of Illinois and in the election 9precinct 30 days; that I am fully qualified to vote, that I am 10not registered to vote anywhere else in the United States, 11that I intend to remain a resident of the State of Illinois and 12of the election precinct, that I intend to return to the State 13of Illinois, and that the above statements are true.14..............................15(His or her signature or mark)16    Subscribed and sworn to before me, an officer qualified to 17administer oaths, on (insert date).18........................................19Signature of officer administering oath.20    Upon receipt of the executed duplicate affidavit of 21Registration, the county clerk shall transfer the information 22contained thereon to duplicate Registration Cards provided for 23in Section 4-8 of this Article and shall attach thereto a copy 24of each of the duplicate affidavit of registration and 25thereafter such registration card and affidavit shall 26constitute the registration of such person the same as if he   SB0059- 7 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1had applied for registration in person.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after 3January 1, 2026, before an applicant is registered under this 4Section, the registration officer shall verify the applicant's 5citizenship status using the secure database maintained by the 6Secretary of State under Section 38 of the Secretary of State 7Act. If the information in the database indicates that the 8applicant is not a United States citizen, then the applicant's 9card shall be marked with the word "incomplete", and the 10registration officer shall notify the applicant in writing 11that (i) the application is incomplete and (ii) the applicant 12may not vote unless the applicant appears before the county 13clerk to present evidence that the applicant is a United 14States citizen. 15(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 98-115, eff. 10-1-13; 1698-756, eff. 7-16-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-180, eff. 177-29-15.) 18    (10 ILCS 5/5-9)  (from Ch. 46, par. 5-9)19    Sec. 5-9. Except as herein provided, no person shall be 20registered unless he applies in person to registration 21officer, answers such relevant questions as may be asked of 22him by the registration officer, and executes the affidavit of 23registration. The registration officer shall require the 24applicant to furnish two forms of identification, and except 25in the case of a homeless individual, one of which must include   SB0059- 8 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1his or her residence address. These forms of identification 2shall include, but not be limited to, any of the following: 3driver's license, social security card, public aid 4identification card, utility bill, employee or student 5identification card, lease or contract for a residence, credit 6card, or a civic, union or professional association membership 7card. The registration officer shall require a homeless 8individual to furnish evidence of his or her use of the mailing 9address stated. This use may be demonstrated by a piece of mail 10addressed to that individual and received at that address or 11by a statement from a person authorizing use of the mailing 12address. The registration officer shall require each applicant 13for registration to read or have read to him the affidavit of 14registration before permitting him to execute the affidavit.15    One of the Deputy Registrars, the Judge of Registration, 16or an Officer of Registration, County Clerk, or clerk in the 17office of the County Clerk, shall administer to all persons 18who shall personally apply to register the following oath or 19affirmation:20    "You do solemnly swear (or affirm) that you will fully and 21truly answer all such questions as shall be put to you touching 22your place of residence, name, place of birth, your 23qualifications as an elector and your right as such to 24register and vote under the laws of the State of Illinois."25    The Registration Officer shall satisfy himself that each 26applicant for registration is qualified to register before   SB0059- 9 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1registering him. If the registration officer has reason to 2believe that the applicant is a resident of a Soldiers' and 3Sailors' Home or any facility which is licensed or certified 4pursuant to the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental 5Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care 6Act, or the MC/DD Act, the following question shall be put, 7"When you entered the home which is your present address, was 8it your bona fide intention to become a resident thereof?" Any 9voter of a township, city, village or incorporated town in 10which such applicant resides, shall be permitted to be present 11at the place of precinct registration, and shall have the 12right to challenge any applicant who applies to be registered.13    In case the officer is not satisfied that the applicant is 14qualified, he shall forthwith in writing notify such applicant 15to appear before the County Clerk to furnish further proof of 16his qualifications. Upon the card of such applicant shall be 17written the word "Incomplete" and no such applicant shall be 18permitted to vote unless such registration is satisfactorily 19completed as hereinafter provided. No registration shall be 20taken and marked as "incomplete" if information to complete it 21can be furnished on the date of the original application.22    Any person claiming to be an elector in any election 23precinct in such township, city, village or incorporated town 24and whose registration is marked "Incomplete" may make and 25sign an application in writing, under oath, to the County 26Clerk in substance in the following form:  SB0059- 10 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1    "I do solemnly swear that I, .........., did on (insert 2date) make application to the Board of Registry of the 3........ precinct of ........ ward of the City of .... or of 4the ......... District ......... Town of .......... (or to the 5County Clerk of .............) and ............ County; that 6said Board or Clerk refused to complete my registration as a 7qualified voter in said precinct, that I reside in said 8precinct (or that I intend to reside in said precinct), am a 9duly qualified voter and entitled to vote in said precinct at 10the next election.11...........................12(Signature of Applicant)"13    All such applications shall be presented to the County 14Clerk by the applicant, in person between the hours of nine 15o'clock a.m. and five o'clock p.m., on Monday and Tuesday of 16the third week subsequent to the weeks in which the 1961 and 171962 precinct re-registrations are to be held, and thereafter 18for the registration provided in Section 5-17 of this Article, 19all such applications shall be presented to the County Clerk 20by the applicant in person between the hours of nine o'clock 21a.m. and nine o'clock p.m. on Monday and Tuesday of the third 22week prior to the date on which such election is to be held.23    Any otherwise qualified person who is absent from his 24county of residence either due to business of the United 25States or because he is temporarily outside the territorial 26limits of the United States may become registered by mailing   SB0059- 11 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1an application to the county clerk within the periods of 2registration provided for in this Article or by simultaneous 3application for registration by mail and vote by mail ballot 4as provided in Article 20 of this Code.5    Upon receipt of such application the county clerk shall 6immediately mail an affidavit of registration in duplicate, 7which affidavit shall contain the following and such other 8information as the State Board of Elections may think it 9proper to require for the identification of the applicant:10    Name. The name of the applicant, giving surname and first 11or Christian name in full, and the middle name or the initial 12for such middle name, if any.13    Sex.14    Residence. The name and number of the street, avenue or 15other location of the dwelling, and such additional clear and 16definite description as may be necessary to determine the 17exact location of the dwelling of the applicant. Where the 18location cannot be determined by street and number, then the 19Section, congressional township and range number may be used, 20or such other information as may be necessary, including post 21office mailing address.22    Electronic mail address, if the registrant has provided 23this information. 24    Term of residence in the State of Illinois and the 25precinct.26    Nativity. The State or country in which the applicant was   SB0059- 12 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1born.2    Citizenship. Whether the applicant is native born or 3naturalized. If naturalized, the court, place and date of 4naturalization.5    Age. Date of birth, by month, day and year.6    Out of State address of ..........................7AFFIDAVIT OF REGISTRATION8State of .........) 9                 )ss 10County of ........)11    I hereby swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen of the 12United States; that on the day of the next election I shall 13have resided in the State of Illinois for 6 months and in the 14election precinct 30 days; that I am fully qualified to vote, 15that I am not registered to vote anywhere else in the United 16States, that I intend to remain a resident of the State of 17Illinois and of the election precinct, that I intend to return 18to the State of Illinois, and that the above statements are 19true.20..............................21(His or her signature or mark)22    Subscribed and sworn to before me, an officer qualified to 23administer oaths, on (insert date).24........................................25Signature of officer administering oath.   SB0059- 13 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1    Upon receipt of the executed duplicate affidavit of 2Registration, the county clerk shall transfer the information 3contained thereon to duplicate Registration Cards provided for 4in Section 5-7 of this Article and shall attach thereto a copy 5of each of the duplicate affidavit of registration and 6thereafter such registration card and affidavit shall 7constitute the registration of such person the same as if he 8had applied for registration in person.9    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after 10January 1, 2026, before an applicant is registered under this 11Section, the registration officer shall verify the applicant's 12citizenship status using the secure database maintained by the 13Secretary of State under Section 38 of the Secretary of State 14Act. If the information in the database indicates that the 15applicant is not a United States citizen, then the applicant's 16card shall be marked with the word "incomplete", and the 17registration officer shall notify the applicant in writing 18that (i) the application is incomplete and (ii) the applicant 19may not vote unless the applicant appears before the county 20clerk to present evidence that the applicant is a United 21States citizen. 22(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 98-115, eff. 10-1-13; 2398-756, eff. 7-16-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-180, eff. 247-29-15.) 25    (10 ILCS 5/6-37)  (from Ch. 46, par. 6-37)  SB0059- 14 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1    Sec. 6-37. Except as otherwise provided for in Section 26-29 of this Article, no person shall be registered unless he 3applies in person to a registration officer, answers such 4relevant questions as may be asked of him by the registration 5officer, and executes the affidavit of registration. The 6registration officer shall require the applicant to furnish 7two forms of identification, and except in the case of a 8homeless individual, one of which must include his or her 9residence address. These forms of identification shall 10include, but not be limited to, any of the following: driver's 11license, social security card, public aid identification card, 12utility bill, employee or student identification card, lease 13or contract for a residence, credit card, or a civic, union or 14professional association membership card. The registration 15officer shall require a homeless individual to furnish 16evidence of his or her use of the mailing address stated. This 17use may be demonstrated by a piece of mail addressed to that 18individual and received at that address or by a statement from 19a person authorizing use of the mailing address. The 20registration officer shall require each applicant for 21registration to read or have read to him the affidavit of 22registration before permitting him to execute the affidavit.23    The registration officer shall satisfy himself that each 24applicant for registration is qualified to register before 25registering him. Any voter of the ward, village or 26incorporated town in which such applicant resides, shall be   SB0059- 15 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1permitted to be present at the place of registration, and 2shall have the right to challenge any applicant who applies to 3be registered.4    In case the officer is not satisfied that the applicant is 5qualified he shall forthwith in writing notify such applicant 6to appear before the board of election commissioners to 7furnish further proof of his qualification. Upon the card of 8such applicant shall be written the word "incomplete" and no 9such applicant shall be permitted to vote unless such 10registration is satisfactorily completed as hereinafter 11provided.12    Any person claiming to be an elector in any election 13precinct in such city, village or incorporated town and whose 14registration is marked "incomplete" may make and sign an 15application in writing, under oath, to the board of election 16commissioners in substance in the following form:17    "I do solemnly swear that I,.... did on .... make 18application to the board of registry of the .... precinct of 19.... ward of the city of ....(or to the board of election 20commissioners of ....) and that said board refused to complete 21my registration as a qualified voter in said precinct, that I 22reside in said precinct, am a duly qualified voter and 23entitled to vote in said precinct at the next election.24....(Signature of Applicant)"25    In all cities, villages or incorporated towns having a 26population of less than 200,000 all such applications shall be   SB0059- 16 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1presented to the board of election commissioners by the 2applicant, in person, between the hours of nine o'clock a.m., 3and five o'clock p.m. on Tuesday or Wednesday of the second 4week prior to the week in which such election is to be held, 5and in all municipalities having a population of more than 6200,000 and having a board of election commissioners and in 7all cities, villages and incorporated towns within the 8jurisdiction of such board, all such applications shall be 9presented to the board of election commissioners by the 10applicant, in person between the hours of nine o'clock a.m. 11and five o'clock p.m., on Monday and Tuesday of the third week 12prior to the week in which such election is to be held.13    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after 14January 1, 2026, before an applicant is registered under this 15Section, the registration officer shall verify the applicant's 16citizenship status using the secure database maintained by the 17Secretary of State under Section 38 of the Secretary of State 18Act. If the information in the database indicates that the 19applicant is not a United States citizen, then the applicant's 20card shall be marked with the word "incomplete", and the 21registration officer shall notify the applicant in writing 22that (i) the application is incomplete and (ii) the applicant 23may not vote unless the applicant appears before the county 24clerk to present evidence that the applicant is a United 25States citizen. 26(Source: P.A. 96-317, eff. 1-1-10.)   SB0059- 17 -LRB104 07475 SPS 17517 b1    Section 10. The Secretary of State Act is amended by 2adding Section 38 as follows: 3    (15 ILCS 305/38 new)4    Sec. 38. Secure voter registration database. By January 1, 52026, the Secretary of State shall establish and maintain a 6secure database that is accessible to local election officials 7and that indicates whether the particular person to whom a 8driver's license or State identification card has been issued 9is a United States citizen. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.